Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.642

Climate and rural energy development center—Authorized.

The legislature authorizes the establishment of the Washington climate and rural energy development center in the Washington State University energy program to serve as a central, nonregulatory clearinghouse of credible and reliable information addressing various aspects of climate change and clean energy activities.

[ 2002 c 250 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2002 c 250: See notes following RCW 28B.30.640.